California statutes. Public Contract Code
Unless otherwise provided, this chapter shall apply to all purchases made on behalf of the Legislature, whether made by the Senate Committee on Rules, the Assembly Committee on Rules, the Joint Rules Committee, or any other agency of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1094, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.

The following definitions govern the interpretation of this chapter:

(a) “Department” means the Department of General Services.

(b) “Board” means the California Integrated Waste Management Board, as defined pursuant to Section 40110 of the Public Resources Code.

(c) “Recycled paper product” means all paper and woodpulp products containing postconsumer and secondary materials. “Postconsumer material” means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as a solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item. “Secondary material” means fragments of finished products or finished products of a manufacturing process, which has converted a virgin resource into a commodity of real economic value, and includes postconsumer material, but does not include fibrous waste generated during the manufacturing process such as fibers recovered from wastewater or trimmings of paper machine rolls (mill broke), wood slabs, chips, sawdust, or other wood residue from a manufacturing process. “Recycled paper product” means a paper product with not less than 50 percent, by fiber weight, consisting of secondary and postconsumer material with not less than 10 percent of fiber weight consisting of postconsumer material.

For high speed copier paper, offset paper, forms bond, computer printout paper, carbonless paper, file folders, white wove envelopes, and for other uncoated printing and writing papers, such as writing and office paper, book paper, cotton fiber paper containing 25 to 75 percent cotton fiber, and cover stock, the minimum content standard shall be no less than 20 percent of fiber weight of postconsumer materials beginning December 31, 1994. The minimum content standard shall be increased to 30 percent of fiber weight of postconsumer materials beginning on December 31, 1998.

(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), “recycled product” means all materials, goods, and supplies, excluding paper products, no less than 50 percent of the total weight of which consists of secondary and postconsumer material with not less than 10 percent of its total weight consisting of postconsumer material. A recycled product shall include any product that could have been disposed of as solid waste having completed its life cycle as a consumer item, but otherwise is refurbished for reuse without substantial alteration of its form. “Postconsumer material” means a finished material that would have been disposed of as a solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item, and does not include manufacturing wastes. “Secondary material” means fragments of finished products or finished products of a manufacturing process, which has converted a resource into a commodity of real economic value, and includes postconsumer material, but does not include excess virgin resources of the manufacturing process.

(2) “Recycled product” also means other flat rolled steel products no less than 25 percent of the total weight of which consists of secondary and postconsumer material, with not less than 10 percent of total weight consisting of postconsumer material. Products made with flat rolled steel meeting these content percentages include, but are not limited to, automobiles, cans, appliances, and office furniture and supplies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 319, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12305.

This chapter applies to the procurement and purchase of the following materials, goods, and supplies, or products containing the following recycled resources, and meeting the specified content requirements pursuant to either subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 12301, whichever is applicable:

(a) Paper products, that include, but are not limited to, fine grades of paper, corrugated boxes, newsprint, tissue, and toweling.

(b) Glass.

(c) Oil.

(d) Plastic.

(e) Solvents and paint, including water-based paint.

(f) Tires.

(g) Steel.

(h) Antifreeze.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 363, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

12305.5.

If a recycled product costs more than the same product made with virgin material, the Legislature shall purchase fewer of those more costly products or apply cost savings, if any, gained from buying other recycled products towards the purchase of those more costly products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 816, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

12306.

This chapter does not apply to the procurement and purchase of asphalt concrete and portland cement concrete pavement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1094, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Recycled Paper Products [12310. - 12310.]

12310.

(a) On and after January 1, 1997, at least 50 percent of the total dollar amount of paper products purchased or procured by the Legislature shall be purchased as a recycled paper product, as defined in Section 12301. In addition, at least 25 percent of the total fine writing and printing paper purchased by the Legislature shall be recycled paper products, as defined in Section 12301.

If at any time the requirement for recycled products has not been met, the Legislature and the department, in consultation with the board, shall review the procurement policies of the Legislature and shall make recommendations for immediate revisions to ensure that each requirement is met. Revisions include, but are not limited to, raising the purchasing preference and altering the requirements for each or all recycled products. The department, in consultation with the board, shall present its conclusions and recommendations on these revisions of procurement policies to the Legislature in the department’s biennial report pursuant to Section 12225.

(b) When contracting with the Legislature for the sale of recycled paper products, the contractor shall certify in writing to the contracting officer or his or her representative, that the recycled paper products offered contain the minimum percentage of waste materials required by subdivision (c) of Section 12301. The contractor shall specify the minimum, if not the exact, percentage of recycled product in the paper product, including both the secondary and postconsumer material content. This certification shall be furnished under penalty of perjury.

(c) The Legislature may, in consultation with the board, print a symbol on paper products selected by the Legislature. The symbol shall be similar to the following:

Printed on recycled paper. This symbol shall be printed only on paper products meeting the definition of recycled paper products in Section 12301.

(d) This section shall not prevent the Legislature from using existing stocks of paper products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 816, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Recycled Materials, Goods, and Supplies [12320. - 12320.]

12320.

(a) The Legislature shall require contractors to certify in writing to the contracting officer, or his or her representative, whether the materials, goods, or supplies offered contain the minimum percentage of recycled product required by subdivision (d) of Section 12301. The contractor shall specify the minimum, if not exact, percentage of recycled product in the product, both the secondary and postconsumer material content. This certification shall be furnished under penalty of perjury.

(b) The Legislature, in consultation with the department and the board, shall review and revise the procurement specifications used by the Legislature in order to eliminate discrimination against the procurement or purchase of recycled products whenever quality of a recycled product is reasonably equal to the same product manufactured with virgin resources. In determining procurement specifications, with the exception of any specifications that have been established to preserve the public health and safety, all legislative procurement and purchasing specifications shall be established in a manner that results in the maximum legislative procurement and purchase of recycled products.

(c) The Legislature, in consultation with the board, shall establish purchasing practices that ensure, to the maximum extent feasible, the purchase of materials, goods, and supplies that may be recycled or reused when discarded.

(d) The Legislature shall give purchase preference to recycled products when all of the following apply:

(1) The product meets applicable standards.

(2) The product can be substituted for a comparable nonrecycled product.

(3) The product costs no more than a comparable nonrecycled product.

(e) To encourage the use of postconsumer waste, the Legislature’s specifications shall require recycled product contracts to be awarded to the bidder whose product contains the greater percentage of postconsumer material if the fitness and quality and price meet the requirements in subdivision (d) of Section 12301 and Section 12310.

(f) The Legislature shall set the following goals for purchases made by the Legislature or any individual or group of individuals purchasing on behalf of the Legislature:

(1) By January 1, 1991, at least 10 percent of legislative purchases are of recycled products.

(2) By January 1, 1993, at least 20 percent of legislative purchases are of recycled products.

(3) By January 1, 1995, at least 40 percent of legislative purchases are of recycled products.

(4) The goals specified in this subdivision shall be applied to the purchase by the Legislature of products described in subdivisions (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g) of Section 12305 and shall be applied to the total dollar amount of the combined purchases of those products.

Each specified goal shall be met for each product listed pursuant to Section 12305. If at any time a goal has not been met, the Legislature and the department, in consultation with the board, shall review procurement policies of the Legislature and shall make recommendations for immediate revisions to ensure that each goal is met. Revisions include, but are not limited to, raising the purchasing preference and altering the goals for all or each recycled product. The department, in consultation with the board, shall present its conclusions and recommendations on these revisions of procurement policies to the Legislature in the department’s annual report pursuant to Section 12225.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 427, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Environmentally Preferable Purchasing [12400. - 12404.]

12400.

For purposes of this chapter, “environmentally preferable purchasing” means the procurement or acquisition of goods and services that have a lesser or reduced effect on human health and the environment when compared with competing goods or services that serve the same purpose. This comparison shall take into consideration, to the extent feasible, raw materials acquisition, production, manufacturing, packaging, distribution, reuse, operation, maintenance, disposal, energy efficiency, product performance, durability, safety, the needs of the purchaser, and cost.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 575, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

12401.

The Department of General Services, in consultation with the California Environmental Protection Agency, members of the public, industry, and public health and environmental organizations, shall provide state agencies with information and assistance regarding environmentally preferable purchasing including, but not limited to, the following:

(a) The promotion of environmentally preferable purchasing.

(b) The development and implementation of a strategy to increase environmentally preferable purchasing. This may include the development of statewide policies, guidelines, programs, and regulations.

(c) The coordination with other state and federal agencies, task forces, workgroups, regulatory efforts, research and data collection efforts, and other programs and services relating to environmentally preferable purchasing.

(d) The development and implementation, to the extent fiscally feasible, of training programs designed to instill the importance and value of environmentally preferable purchasing.

(e) The development, to the extent fiscally feasible, of an environmentally preferable purchasing best practices manual for state purchasing employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 575, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

12401.5.

Within existing resources, the Department of General Services shall designate a single point of contact for state agencies, suppliers, and other interested parties to contact regarding environmentally preferable purchasing issues.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 575, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

12402.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit, limit, or supersede recycled content requirements pursuant to any other provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 575, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

12403.

Nothing contained in any policy regarding environmentally preferable purchasing may be construed as requiring the acquisition of goods or services that do not perform adequately for their intended use, exclude adequate competition, or are not available at a reasonable price in a reasonable period of time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 575, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

12404.

Manufacturers, vendors, or other nongovernmental entities contracting with the Department of General Services shall certify in writing that any environmental attribute claims they make concerning their products and services are consistent with the Federal Trade Commission’s Guidelines for the Use of Environmental Marketing Terms.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 575, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. The Federal Laboratory Contracting Act [12500. - 12502.]

12500.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Federal Laboratory Contracting Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 256, Sec. 1.   Effective September 14, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12501.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Technological advances are an important part of California’s economy and, therefore, it would be wise for state agencies to contract, in a facile and efficient manner, with federally funded Department of Energy (DOE) and National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA) research and development centers and NASA field centers located in California that are often at the forefront of science and technology.

(b) As the major funding agency and owner of several research and development centers located in California, DOE allows outside parties to contract with the centers but requires the centers, when initiating and finalizing any contracts with outside parties, to adhere to rigorous policies and procedures specified by federal laws and regulations. NASA adheres to similar federal laws and regulations when initiating and finalizing contracts between its research and development centers or field centers in California and outside parties. The State of California has its own laws, regulations, and procedures governing state contracts. The research and development centers and field centers owned or owned and operated by DOE and NASA have attempted to contract with state agencies and departments in California but have had minimal success. Conflicting provisions in federal and state laws, regulations, and policies, and seemingly unachievable compromises appear to be the major limiting factors in the successful negotiation of contracts between the federally funded centers and California state agencies and departments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 256, Sec. 1.   Effective September 14, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12501.5.

(a) The Governor shall designate the Secretary of State and Consumer Services as the state’s representative for purposes of communicating and negotiating with representatives of the United States Department of Energy, National Aeronautics and Space Administration, federally funded DOE and NASA research and development centers in California, and NASA field centers in California regarding any issue that may affect a contractual relationship between the state and these federal entities. The Secretary of State and Consumer Services may delegate this responsibility to the Director of the Department of General Services if the secretary views such delegation as necessary to advance the successful negotiation of contracts between the state and one or more of those federal entities.

(b) The Secretary of State and Consumer Services or his or her designee shall develop policies and procedures to encourage and enable the contracting process with federally funded DOE and NASA research and development centers and NASA field centers and shall develop model contract language that is available for use by any state agency or department in negotiating a contract with one of these centers. The Regents of the University of California shall not be considered a state agency for the purposes of this chapter, and specifically shall not be covered as prime contractor with the DOE for management of DOE laboratories.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 256, Sec. 1.   Effective September 14, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12502.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a state agency that enters into a prime contract with a federally funded DOE or NASA research and development center or NASA field center, or that enters into a prime contract with another entity that, in turn, issues a subcontract to a federally funded DOE or NASA research and development center or a NASA field center located in California may, if requested by the contracting party, make contract payments to the center for contracted services in advance.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a state agency that enters into a prime contract with a federally funded DOE or NASA research and development center or NASA field center, or that enters into a prime contract with another entity that, in turn, issues a subcontract to a federally funded DOE or NASA research and development center or NASA field center located in the state may not indemnify the center with respect to products liability, intellectual property, and general liability claims arising out of the activities to be carried out by the center pursuant to the contract.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a state agency shall not audit the records of any federally funded DOE or NASA research and development center or NASA field center, but the state agency may rely on the services of any cognizant federal audit agency, including the Defense Contract Audit Agency, the United States Government Accountability Office, the DOE Office of Inspector General, and the NASA Office of Inspector General, to satisfy auditing requirements.

(d) For purposes of this chapter:

(1) “Federally funded research and development center” means a federally funded research and development center as defined in Subpart 2.1 of Part 2 of Subchapter A of Chapter 1 of Title 48 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) “NASA field center” means a field center identified as such by NASA and authorized by Title III of the Space Act of 1958.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 256, Sec. 1.   Effective September 14, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Claims and Disputes [19100. - 19102.]

19100.

(a) Presentation of a claim pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code is not required to commence a legal action or arbitration proceeding for money or damages on a contract with the state, but any action or proceeding shall be commenced not later than six months after either of the following:

(1) The contracting agency’s final written decision under contract claim provisions.

(2) The accrual of the cause of action, if there are no contract claim provisions.

(b) This section shall not apply to a claim that is subject to the provisions of Section 10240.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 438, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19102.

(a) (1) The second lowest bidder, and any person, firm, association, trust, partnership, labor organization, corporation, or other legal entity which has, prior to the letting of the bids on the public works project in question, entered into a contract with the second lowest bidder, may bring an action in superior court if that entity suffers damages as a result of the bid of the second lowest bidder for any contract subject to this part not being accepted due to the successful bidder’s violation, as evidenced by the conviction of the successful bidder therefor, of any provision of Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of the Labor Code or of the Unemployment Insurance Code, or of both. 

(2) There shall be a rebuttable presumption that a successful bidder who has been convicted of a violation of any provision of Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of the Labor Code or of the Unemployment Insurance Code, or of both, was awarded the bid because that successful bidder was able to lower the bid due to this violation or these violations occurring on the contract for public work awarded by the public agency. 

(b) In an action brought pursuant to this section, the court may award costs and reasonable attorney’s fees, in an amount to be determined in the court’s discretion, to the prevailing party. 

(c) For purposes of an action brought pursuant to this section: 

(1) Employee status shall be determined pursuant to Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of the Labor Code with respect to alleged violations of that division, pursuant to the Unemployment Insurance Code with respect to alleged violations of that code, or pursuant to Section 2750. 5 of the Labor Code with respect to alleged violations of either Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) or of the Unemployment Insurance Code, or of both. 

(2) “Second lowest bidder” means the second lowest qualified bidder deemed responsive by the public agency awarding the contract for public work. 

(3) The “second lowest bidder” and the “successful bidder” may include any person, firm, association, corporation, or other legal entity. 

(d) A second lowest bidder who has been convicted of a violation of any provision of Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of the Labor Code or of the Unemployment Insurance Code, or both, within one year prior to filing the bid for public work, and who has failed to take affirmative steps to correct that violation or those violations, is prohibited from taking any action authorized by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 906, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Exemptions [19150. - 19150.]

19150.

Any contract related to the 2020 United States Census and entered into by the Government Operations Agency or the Office of Planning and Research is exempt from this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 455, Sec. 4.   (SB 877)   Effective September 17, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2.5. CONTRACTING BY JUDICIAL BRANCH ENTITIES [19201. - 19210.]

19201.

This part may be cited as the California Judicial Branch Contract Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 10, Sec. 21.   (SB 78)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19202.

The Legislature finds and declares that placing all public contract provisions for judicial branch entities in one part will make that law clearer and easier to find. Further, it is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this part to achieve the objectives as set forth in Sections 100, 101, and 102.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 10, Sec. 21.   (SB 78)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19203.

This part shall apply to all contracts initially entered into or amended by judicial branch entities on or after October 1, 2011.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 10, Sec. 21.   (SB 78)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19204.

(a) All judicial branch entities shall comply with the provisions of this code that are applicable to state agencies and departments related to the procurement of goods and services, including information technology goods and services. All contracts with total cost estimated at more than one million dollars ($1,000,000), except contracts covered by Section 68511.9 of the Government Code, shall be subject to the review and recommendations of the Bureau of State Audits to ensure compliance with this part. All judicial branch entities shall notify the State Auditor, in writing, of the existence of any such contracts within 10 business days of entering the contract. In addition, all administrative and infrastructure information technology projects of the Judicial Council or the courts with
 total costs estimated at more than five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be subject to the reviews and recommendations of the California Technology Agency, as specified in Section 68511.9 of the Government Code.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), procurement and contracting for the planning, design, construction, rehabilitation, renovation, replacement, lease, or acquisition of court facilities shall be conducted by judicial branch entities consistent with the relevant provisions of this code applicable to state agencies.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this part does not apply to procurement and contracting by judicial branch entities that are related to trial court construction, including, but not limited to, the planning, design, construction, rehabilitation, renovation, replacement, lease, or acquisition of trial court facilities. However, this part
 shall apply to contracts for maintenance of all judicial branch facilities that are not under the operation and management of the Department of General Services.

(d) Only until the Judicial Council adopts the Judicial Branch Contracting Manual required pursuant to Section 19206, judicial branch entities shall instead be governed by applicable policies and procedures in the State Administrative Manual and the State Contracting Manual, or policies and procedures as otherwise required by law to be adopted by the Department of General Services applicable to state agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 36, Sec. 71.   (SB 92)   Effective June 30, 2011.   Operative July 27, 2011, pursuant to Sec. 83 of Ch. 36, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 136, Sec. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

19205.

(a) As used in this part, “judicial branch entity” means any superior court, court of appeal, the California Supreme Court, the Judicial Council, the Habeas Corpus Resource Center, or the Administrative Office of the Courts.

(b) Where there is a reference in this code to an officer or employee of a state agency, for purposes of this part, these terms shall refer to a member, judicial officer, officer,
 employee, or other person of a judicial branch entity, as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 10, Sec. 21.   (SB 78)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19206.

The Judicial Council shall adopt and publish no later than January 1, 2012, a Judicial Branch Contracting Manual incorporating procurement and contracting policies and procedures that must be followed by all judicial branch entities subject to this part. The policies and procedures shall include a requirement that each judicial branch entity shall adopt a local contracting manual for procurement and contracting for goods or services by that judicial branch entity. The policies and
 procedures in the manuals shall be consistent with this code and substantially similar to the provisions contained in the State Administrative Manual and the State Contracting Manual.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 10, Sec. 21.   (SB 78)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19207.

Except as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 19204 or as otherwise specifically required by law applicable to any judicial branch entity, nothing in this part is intended, nor shall it be construed, to require the approval, review, or involvement of any other state entity, including, but not limited to, the Department of General Services or the Secretary of California Technology, in the procurement of any judicial branch goods or services, including information technology goods or
 services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 10, Sec. 21.   (SB 78)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19208.

Nothing in this part is intended, nor shall it be construed to permit, the application of provisions of this code that do not apply to state agencies and departments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 10, Sec. 21.   (SB 78)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19209.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the Judicial Council shall annually provide a report to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the State Auditor that provides information related to contracts and payments for the trial courts pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c). The report shall be provided no later than September 30 of each year, covering the state fiscal year ending June 30 of that year. Additionally, judicial branch entities using the Financial Information System for California (FISCal) shall participate with the state’s transparency effort by making their contract and payment information available for the state’s transparency websites on a rolling basis. For these entities, the judicial branch shall ensure their
 contract and payment information is entered in FISCal for the state transparency websites and for state department audit purposes.

(b) For the trial courts, payment data shall include a list of all vendors or contractors receiving payments during the reporting period. For each vendor or contractor receiving any payment during the reporting period, the report shall identify the amount of payment to the contractor or vendor, the type of service or good provided, and the judicial branch entity or entities with which the vendor or contractor was contracted to provide that service or good.

(c) For the trial courts, the report shall include all contracts and contract amendments made during the report period. The report shall identify the vendor or contractor, the type of
 service or good provided under the contract, and, if applicable, the nature of the amendment, the duration of the amendment, and the cost of the amendment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 36, Sec. 44.   (AB 3364)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

19210.

(a) The California State Auditor shall do all of the following:

(1) On or before March 15, 2014, biennially thereafter, and every three years beginning in calendar year 2025, identify five judicial branch entities, excluding the Administrative Office of the Courts, for audit to assess the implementation of this part by the judicial branch entity based upon risk factors that include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Significant changes in legal or other requirements that have occurred that impact compliance with this part.

(B) The amount of
 time since the last audit performed of the identified judicial branch entity to assess its implementation and compliance with this part.

(C) Previous audit results or known deficiencies.

(D) Significant or unusual changes in management or high employee turnover.

(E) The complexity and size of the judicial branch entity.

(F) The level of sophistication and complexity of existing contracting practices and procedures.

(G) The total volume and type of procurement made by the judicial branch entity compared with overall judicial branch procurement.

(H) Substantial changes in total procurements, including, but not limited to, number and allotted amount, from one year to the next.

(2) On or before March 15 of the year in which the judicial branch entities are identified pursuant to paragraph (1), notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the Joint Legislative Audit Committee of the five judicial branch entities identified and the estimated cost to conduct an audit of each judicial branch entity.

(3) On or before July 1 of the year in which the judicial branch entities are identified, commence an audit of each identified judicial branch entity, subject to an appropriation for this audit whereby moneys are allocated in the annual Budget Act to one or more funds that are available for use by judicial branch
 entities. Upon completion of the final audit report, as identified in paragraph (4), the Administrative Office of the Courts shall reimburse the California State Auditor for the actual costs of the work performed.

(4) Provide the judicial branch entity with a reasonable opportunity to respond to the findings of the audit. An audit report shall not be considered final until this opportunity is provided and any response is included or incorporated into the audit report.

(5) On or before January 15 of the fiscal year for which the appropriation for the audit was made, report the judicial branch entity audit findings, including any response by the judicial branch entity, to the judicial branch entity, the Legislature, the Judicial
 Council, and the Department of Finance.

(6) Annually provide updates to the Legislature on the status of the judicial branch entity implementation of an audit recommendation.

(b) If, on or before March 15 of the year in which the judicial branch entities are identified pursuant to subdivision (a), the California State Auditor identifies, on the basis of the risk factors described in subdivision (a), judicial branch entities for audit in addition to the five identified pursuant to subdivision (a) and notifies the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the Joint Legislative Audit Committee of these additional entities, along with the estimated cost of each audit, and an appropriation is made for this purpose in the same manner as described in paragraph (3) of
 subdivision (a), the California State Auditor shall then audit the additional judicial branch entities and provide a final audit report as described in paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (a).

(c) On or before July 1, 2015, biennially thereafter, and every three years beginning in calendar year 2025, the California State Auditor shall commence an audit of the Administrative Office of the Courts, to assess the implementation of, and compliance with, this part, subject to an appropriation by the Legislature to the Judicial Council for transfer to the State Audit Fund for this purpose, and provide a final audit report in the manner described in paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (a).

(d) The California State Auditor may follow up on a prior audit finding at any time.

(e) The California State Auditor shall conduct an audit pursuant to this section in accordance with Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 8543) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Pursuant to Section 8546.2 of the Government Code, the California State Auditor shall request updates from an audited judicial branch entity regarding its progress in implementing audit recommendations made pursuant to this section. The audited judicial branch entity shall provide these updates at intervals prescribed by the California State Auditor so that the California State Auditor may conduct appropriate followup activities.

(f) Moneys that have been transferred to the State Audit Fund pursuant to this section to audit a specific judicial branch entity, but have not been expended by the
 California State Auditor at the time the California State Auditor provides its final audit report for that judicial branch entity, shall revert back to the fund from which the moneys were transferred.

(g) A report submitted pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(h) If the California State Auditor is selected as the auditing entity pursuant to subdivision (j) of Section 77206 of the Government Code, then the California State Auditor may combine the results of an audit of a trial court conducted pursuant to that section with an audit of the same trial court conducted pursuant to this section. The California State Auditor may also combine the results of an audit of the Administrative Office of the Courts pursuant to
 Section 77206 of the Government Code with the results of an audit of the Administrative Office of the Courts pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 837, Sec. 2.   (AB 2628)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. CONTRACTING BY LOCAL AGENCIES [20100. - 22199.6.]



  CHAPTER 1. Local Agency Public Construction Act [20100. - 20929.]



  ARTICLE 1. Title [20100. - 20103.7.]

20100.

This chapter may be cited as the Local Agency Public Construction Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20101.

(a) Except as provided in Section 20111.5, a public entity subject to this part may require that each prospective bidder for a contract complete and submit to the entity a standardized questionnaire and financial statement in a form specified by the entity, including a complete statement of the prospective bidder’s experience in performing public works. The standardized questionnaire may not require prospective bidders to disclose any violations of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code committed prior to January 1, 1998, if a violation was based on a subcontractor’s failure to comply with these provisions and the bidder had no knowledge of the subcontractor’s
 violations. The Department of Industrial Relations, in collaboration with affected agencies and interested parties, shall develop model guidelines for rating bidders, and draft the standardized questionnaire, that may be used by public entities for the purposes of this part. The Department of Industrial Relations, in developing the standardized questionnaire, shall consult with affected public agencies, cities and counties, the construction industry, the surety industry, and other interested parties. The questionnaire and financial statement shall be verified under oath by the bidder in the manner in which civil pleadings in civil actions are verified. The questionnaires and financial statements shall not be public records and shall not be open to public inspection; however, records of the names of contractors applying for prequalification status shall be public records subject to disclosure under
 Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code.
